apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="għer/q__n_m">
    <e><p><l>q</l><r>q<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uq</l><r>q<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/ifajk__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ifajk</l><r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jafek</l><r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/itla__n_f">
    <e><p><l>itla</l><r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tieli</l><r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/enter__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>enter</l><r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nieter</l><r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="f/ellus__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ellus</l><r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lieles</l><r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/eritta__n_f">
    <e><p><l>eritta</l><r>eritta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieret</l><r>eritta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="bh/ima__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjem</l><r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ekkum__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ekkum</l><r>ekkum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kiekem</l><r>ekkum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/arpun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arpun</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rapen</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riepen</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/alvaġġ__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>alvaġġ</l><r>alvaġġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lavaġ</l><r>alvaġġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/abba__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>abba</l><r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bub</l><r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="l/ejl__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ejl</l><r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jieli</l><r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/atba__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>atba</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tabi</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tiebi</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/afrid__n_m">
    <e><p><l>afrid</l><r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>efiered</l><r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/usbieħ__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>usbieħ</l><r>usbieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>siebaħ</l><r>usbieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għar/us__n_m">
    <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ajjes</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/ublett__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ublett</l><r>ublett<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bielet</l><r>ublett<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/itħa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>itħa</l><r>itħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tieħi</l><r>itħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/avetta__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>avetta</l><r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wievet</l><r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/untun__n_m">
    <e><p><l>untun</l><r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>taten</l><r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/ubbiena__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ubbiena</l><r>ubbiena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bieben</l><r>ubbiena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/armug__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>armug</l><r>armug<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rameg</l><r>armug<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="bal/la__n_f">
    <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>al</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="xal/la__n_f">
    <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>el</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="col"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liet</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/oħriet__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>oħriet</l><r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħaret</l><r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għaġ/ina__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ina</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ajjen</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/appell__n_m">
    <e><p><l>appell</l><r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>piepel</l><r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/eru__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>eru</l><r>eru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riewi</l><r>eru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/offa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>offa</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>fief</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/ibka__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ibka</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>biek</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bieki</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/unnara__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>unnara</l><r>unnara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nanar</l><r>unnara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għox/x__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>x</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ux</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/atina__n_f">
    <e><p><l>atina</l><r>atina<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tajjen</l><r>atina<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/ejf__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ejf</l><r>ejf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>juf</l><r>ejf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/anqud__n_m">
    <e><p><l>anqud</l><r>anqud<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>enieqed</l><r>anqud<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/azzola__n_f">
    <e><p><l>azzola</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>zazel</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ziezel</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/urrieqi__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>urrieqi</l><r>urrieqi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieraq</l><r>urrieqi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/ellum__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ellum</l><r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lielem</l><r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="z/untier__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>untier</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>natar</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nieter</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/ormi__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ormi</l><r>ormi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riema</l><r>ormi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="istilla"><i>istil</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="moħriet" c="plough" ><i>m</i><par n="m/oħriet__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zuntier" c="churchyard" ><i>z</i><par n="z/untier__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="demla" c="abscess" ><i>dem</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kazzola" c="saucepan" ><i>k</i><par n="k/azzola__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xifajk" c="troublemaker" ><i>x</i><par n="x/ifajk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċella" c="cell" ><i>ċel</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dubbiena" c="fly" ><i>d</i><par n="d/ubbiena__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sejf" c="sword" ><i>s</i><par n="s/ejf__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġebla" c="stone" ><i>ġeb</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="balla" c="bundle" ><i>bal</i><par n="bal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalla" c="pile" ><i>ħal</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="palla" c="pall" ><i>pal</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stilla" c="straw" ><i>stil</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żunnara" c="animal with fur of more than one colour" ><i>ż</i><par n="s/unnara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="musbieħ" c="lamp" ><i>m</i><par n="m/usbieħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarmug" c="small rabbit" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/armug__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sunnara" c="fishing hook" ><i>s</i><par n="s/unnara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamla" c="nit" ><i>qam</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għafrid" c="devil" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/afrid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċavetta" c="key" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/avetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="umbrella" c="umbrella" ><i>umbrel</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="senter" c="shotgun" ><i>s</i><par n="s/enter__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="katina" c="chain" ><i>k</i><par n="k/atina__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="villa" c="villa" ><i>vil</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabba" c="very small coin" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sellum" c="ladder" ><i>s</i><par n="s/ellum__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spalla" c="shoulder" ><i>spal</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qormi" c="person from Qormi" ><i>q</i><par n="q/ormi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bhima" c="beast" ><i>bh</i><par n="bh/ima__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dublett" c="skirt" ><i>d</i><par n="d/ublett__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bitħa" c="yard" ><i>b</i><par n="b/itħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għarus" c="engaged man" ><i>għar</i><par n="għar/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="beritta" c="cap" ><i>b</i><par n="b/eritta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qoffa" c="basket" ><i>q</i><par n="q/offa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għanqud" c="bunch of fruit" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/anqud__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="basla" c="onion" ><i>bas</i><par n="bal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pożaumbrella" c="umbrella stand" ><i>pożaumbrel</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xatba" c="gate" ><i>x</i><par n="x/atba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xalla" c="shawl" ><i>xal</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bekkum" c="spider shell" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ekkum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fellus" c="chick" ><i>f</i><par n="f/ellus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għerq" c="root" ><i>għer</i><par n="għer/q__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġeru" c="puppy" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/eru__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaġina" c="dough" ><i>għaġ</i><par n="għaġ/ina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kitla" c="kettle" ><i>k</i><par n="k/itla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lejl" c="night" ><i>l</i><par n="l/ejl__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muntun" c="ram" ><i>m</i><par n="m/untun__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żurrieqi" c="person from Żurrieq" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urrieqi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għoxx" c="vagina" ><i>għox</i><par n="għox/x__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xibka" c="fishing net" ><i>x</i><par n="x/ibka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarpun" c="harpoon" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/arpun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappell" c="hat" ><i>k</i><par n="k/appell__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="salvaġġ" c="savage" ><i>s</i><par n="s/alvaġġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nemla" c="ant" ><i>nem</i><par n="xal/la__n_f"/></e>
